Arkansas, session 2025, HB1990.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(1) Ensure that public funds allocated to a state-supported
institution of higher education are utilized efficiently and in alignment
with the objectives of the Arkansas ACCESS Act; and
(2) Reinforce the principles of the Arkansas ACCESS Act by
promoting fiscal responsibility and accountability in higher education
funding.

SECTION 2. The purpose of this act is to work with the Division of
Higher Education to study baccalaureate degrees in liberal arts at state-
supported institutions of higher education to obtain information on the
applicability of the higher education courses within the baccalaureate
degrees in liberal arts, the best use of public funds including the necessity
of the higher education courses to baccalaureate degrees in liberal arts and
the number of students taking the offered higher education courses at state-
supported institutions of higher education, and the impact of the
baccalaureate degrees in liberal arts on job placement and earnings for
*CRH333*
04-15-2025 09:13:33 CRH333

As Engrossed: H4/15/25 HB1990
students.

/s/McAlindon

































04-15-2025 09:13:33 CRH333